fop/hyph/de.xml
    <classes>
        <!-- @!$%^&*()_-+=~`{[}]:;'|<,.>?/0123456789 -->
        aA
        bB
        cC
        dD
        eE
        fF
        gG
        hH
        iI
        jJ
        kK
        lL
        mM
        nN
        oO
        pP
        qQ
        rR
        sS
        tT
        uU
        vV
        wW
        xX
        yY
        zZ
        äÄ
        åÅ
        öÖ
        üÜ
        ß
    </classes>
<!--    <exceptions>-->
<!--        MPREIS-->
<!--        - -->
<!--    </exceptions>-->
    <patterns>
        .ab3a
        .abb2
        .ab5erk
        .ab5er4r
        .abi2
        .ab3it
        .ab3l
        .ab5le
        .ab3ol
        .ab3or
        .ab3sa
        .ab5so
        .ab3u
        .ach4sa
        .achse4
        .ach4sp
        .achts4
        .ack4e
        .ae2
        .aer6schl
        .ago3
        .ag4r
        .ag2u
        .ai2s
        .ak6t5en6de.
        .ak6t5en6den
        .ak6t5en6des
        .al4bl
        .alb3r
        .al4bra
        .alb6rec
        .ale3u4
        .ali3
        .al5l6en
        .alle4r5
        .al4lin
        .allo3
        .all3s
        .al4mau
        .al4pl
        .al5s4e
        .al4t5ak
        .al6t5ang
        .alt6an6l
        .altan6s
        .al4tei
        .al4t5e4l
        .al6t5er6f
        .al6t5er6p
        .alter6s5
        .al4t3h
        .al4ti
        .al4tor
        .al4t5ra
        .al4tri
        .al4tro
        .alt3s4
        .al4t3u
        .al4u
        .alu3s
        .ampe4
        .am5sta
        .amt4s3
        .ana3c
        .an3ae
        .an5alg
        .ana3t
        .anden6ke
        .an3e
        .ang4a
        .an5g4li
        .ang4r
        .angs4
        .angst5
        .ani4s
        .anis5c
        .ank2
        .anla6gentec
        .an3n4a
        .an3o2
        .an4ora
        .ans2
        .ansch4
        .an4si.
        .an5sp
        .an4tag
        .anti5s
        .anz2
        .an5zw
        .apfel5
        .app6le.
        .are3n
        .ar4m5ac
        .ar4mar
        .ar4mau
        .ar4mei
        .ar4mun
        .ar4sc
        .arsch5l
        .ar4tan
        .ar4tau
        .ar4t5ei
        .arter4
        .ar6t5erh
        .ar6t5erk
        .ar4t3r
        .arz2
        .arzt3
        .as2b
        .asbe4
        .asie4
        .as4ko
        .as2p
        .as4ta.
        .as5tar
        .as4zen
        .ata3
        .ate4m3
        .at4h
        .aue4n3
        .au2f3
        .auf5s4
        .auge4
        .au2s3
        .aussen6dung.
        .auto6ren.
        .auto6rin
        .ax2
        .ärm4s
        .är6schl
        .ät2h
        .ät2s
        .bahner6
        .ba4ran
        .bau5chi
        .bauer6f
        .bau3f4
        .beige4
        .bei6ge.
        .be3n4a
        .be3n4e
        .be3r4a
        .ber4e
        .ber4ga
        .berg5ab
        .berg5ar
        .berg5ast
        .ber6g5e6b
        .ber6gin
        .ber4g5l
        .ber4g5o
        .ber4g5r
        .berg5s
        .ber4t5r
        .be3s4a
        .be6t5raum
        .bi2e
        .bi2o
        .bi4os
        .bi4t3a
        .bi4t3r
        .blau3
        .blei5s4
        .boge4
        .bogen5
        .bogens6
        .bor4d5i
        .bo4s3k
        .bre4a
        .brecher6
        .bre6cherk
        .brid4
        .briefen6
        .brie6f5end
        .bruch5s
        .brut5s
        .bu6cher
        .buchse6
        .bue5be
        .bu4ser
        .buster6
        .buß3
        .bü3be
        .by2t
        .ce4ra
        .ch2
        .ch4a
        .char6me.
        .char6mes
        .ch4i
        .chi5er
        .dab2
        .da6ch5en
        .da3la
        .dan4c
        .da2r
        .dar5in
        .dar4m3
        .dar3u
        .da4te.
        .da4tes
        .daue4
        .de4al
        .de3ch
        .de6ck5eri
        .dein4
        .de5ins
        .de5int
        .de6m5ents
        .de3na
        .den4ka
        .den4kl
        .den4ko
        .den4kr
        .denta4
        .de3od
        .de5ran
        .de4rei
        .de5r4en
        .de5skr
        .des4pe
        .de4spo
        .des5se
        .de3st
        .des4ti
        .de3xa
        .di2a
        .di5ae4r
        .di3ä4r
        .di2e
        .die5ne
        .dien4s
        .dienst5a6d
        .dienst5r
        .di5s4ti
        .do4mo
        .dorf3
        .dor6fer
        .do4tr
        .drah6t5en
        .drucker6zeu
        .due3b
        .du6schr
        .dü3b
        .dy2s3
        .ebe4r
        .echo3
        .eck5erk
        .ede4l
        .eh4e
        .ehe3i4
        .ehein4
        .ehe3n
        .ehre4
        .eh4r5er
        .eichs4
        .eich5ste
        .eide4r5
        .ei3e2
        .eier3
        .eigener6
        .ei4lau
        .ein3a
        .ei4nat
        .eine4
        .ei4n5eb
        .ei6n5en6g
        .eins4p
        .eins6tem
        .einzel6lig
        .eisen5
        .ei4spe
        .eis3s4
        .ei4s3t
        .ei6ste
        .ei4s3u
        .ei4tr
        .ek5lam
        .ek3li
        .ek3s
        .el4a
        .el4b3i
        .el4bl
        .elb5s
        .el4fei
        .elfens6
        .el4fl
        .en1
        .en4d3a
        .en4d5ei
        .en4d5er4
        .en5der.
        .en6dost
        .en4d3r
        .end3s
        .en4due
        .en4dü
        .en4g3l
        .eng5sta
        .enk2
        .enn4st
        .en4t3a
        .en4tä
        .en4t5ei
        .en4tem
        .en5thalp
        .en4thi
        .en4t5io
        .en4toe
        .en4t3r
        .en5trep
        .en5trop
        .ent3s4
        .epi3c
        .ep3o4d
        .er6b5aen
        .er4b5än
        .er4b5ei
        .er4b5er
        .er6brecht
        .er4bu
        .er6d5achs
        .er4dan
        .er4dar
        .er4d5ei
        .er4del
        .erden6k
        .er4d5ep
        .er4d5er
        .er6d5ess
        .ere5ch
        .er3ei
        .er3er
        .erfolgsauto6
        .er3in
        .erk2
        .er3lö
        .ern4s
        .er3o4b
        .er3oe
        .ers2
        .er6stab
        .er6st5ein
        .er6ster6
        .erst5eri
        .erst5ers
        .er6stim
        .er6stritt.
        .er6stritten.
        .er4z5el
        .erzen4
        .er6z5eng
        .er4z5er
        .es3p
        .es4s3t
        .es3ta4
        .es3te
        .es5tra
        .est5ri
        .et2h
        .et2s
        .eu1
        .euch4
        .eu3g2
        .eur4
        .eu3t
        .eve4r
        .ex3em
        .fahrzeugin6
        .fan4gl
        .fang5s
        .faus6t5r
        .fe3la
        .felden5
        .fel4d5r
        .fel6lau
        .fel4s5a
        .fel4sp
        .fel4s5t
        .fen2
        .fer4n5o
        .fe4st
        .fest5r
        .fi3d
        .fi5est
        .fi4le.
        .fi4len
        .film5a
        .fil4s3
        .fin4s
        .fi2r
        .flu4g3
        .flus6s5en
        .former6
        .for5tu
        .fra4s
        .fs2
        .fu4sc
        .fus4st
        .ga4me.
        .ga4mes
        .gan4ga
        .gang5sc
        .garnen6
        .gar6n5end
        .ga2s
        .gas3e
        .gas3s
        .gas5tein
        .gas6tras
        .ga2t
        .geb2
        .gebe4a
        .gege4n5
        .gel4b5r
        .ge3lu
        .ge3na
        .gen6aug
        .ge3ne
        .gene5cke
        .gen4ei
        .ge3nu
        .ger4a
        .ger4e
        .ge3ro
        .ge3ru
        .ge3sa
        .ges4e
        .ges4i
        .ges4p
        .ge5stak
        .ge7stei
        .ge3t4u
        .gi2u
        .gla4s5c
        .gol6der
        .gs2
        .gu3ru
        .hafe4
        .haf6ter
        .haft5s4
        .hal4br
        .han4a
        .han4f
        .hang5s
        .ha5sche
        .hauser6w
        .hau4su
        .haut3
        .hau4to
        .he2r
        .he5rae5
        .her6b5ra
        .he5rer
        .he3ri
        .he6r5inn
        .he5ros
        .he4sp
        .hete3
        .he3xa
        .hi2n
        .hin3a
        .hin3u
        .hi2p
        .hi4s
        .hitze5
        .ho4f5en
        .hof3s4
        .ho4la
        .ho4met
        .ho3ra
        .hor4t5r
        .höch4s
        .hu4fer
        .hu3la
        .hund4
        .hu3s4a
        .ia2
        .ibe3
        .ima4ge
        .imm4
        .immen4
        .in1
        .ind2
        .ine2
        .in3eg
        .in3i
        .ink4
        .inse4l5
        .in5skr
        .inu3
        .io2d3
        .ioni5e
        .ire3
        .is2a
        .isar3
        .it2h
        .joni3
        .jor3
        .kabe4
        .ka4b5l
        .ka3la
        .kal4ta
        .kal4t5r
        .ka4t5i4o
        .ke3ra
        .ker4bl
        .ker4na
        .ke3ro
        .ke2t
        .ki2e
        .ko5be
        .ko4ter
        .kraf4
        .kraft5
        .ks2
        .kue3b
        .ku4ran
        .kü3b
        .la5ert
        .lage4n5
        .la3ho
        .lan4d5a
        .lan6de6mi
        .lan4dr
        .lan4gl
        .lan4g5r
        .lang5s
        .lan3t
        .lase4
        .las4t5r
        .le4ar
        .leder5
        .le4gas
        .lei4bl
        .lei4br
        .leider6
        .lei6derf
        .lei4tr
        .le3n4i
        .len4k5a
        .len4kl
        .len4kr
        .les3t
        .le3th
        .lich6ter6sc
        .li2f
        .li5gn
        .lin4kl
        .li3o
        .li4ve.
        .lo4g5in
        .lo4sc
        .losch5
        .lo4sk
        .loss4
        .los3t
        .lo3th
        .lo4tr
        .lo5ver
        .lus4t5e
        .luster6
        .lu5t4h
        .ly2s3
        .ma5lae
        .mal5e4c
        .ma5len
        .mal4z5a
        .man3d
        .mani4e
        .man5t
        .mas4s5u
        .ma4st
        .ma4ß3u
        .mat4c
        .mate3
        .märz3
        .md2
        .mee4ru
        .mel4a
        .me3no
        .men6schl
        .men6schw
        .me3n4u
        .me3nü
        .me4sa
        .mes4sp
        .mes4st
        .me4to
        .met6tend
        .mi2e
        .mie4t5r
        .mi2f
        .mil4z3
        .mi4s3a
        .mi6scha
        .mi6schei
        .mi6sch5l
        .mi6schn
        .mi6scho
        .mi6sch5r
        .mi6sch5w
        .mi2t
        .mi4t3a
        .mit3e
        .mit5in
        .mm2
        .mo2i
        .mo4nau
        .mon6dru
        .möbe4
        .musiker6fo
        .nabe4
        .nae4s5c
        .na4ha
        .nah5ei
        .namens5
        .na4mes
        .nas4s5c
        .na3t4h
        .na3to
        .nä4s3c
        .nebe4n
        .nebens6
        .neider6
        .nei6d5err
        .nere3
        .ner4f
        .ne3ro
        .ne2s
        .neuer6b
        .nich6t5e
        .ni4e
        .nie5r
        .ni2l
        .nil3a
        .no6tentr
        .no4t3h
        .no4top
        .not3r
        .nude4
        .nul6ler
        .nus2
        .nu4t3r
        .oa3s
        .obe4n
        .obe6r5ei
        .ob6ers
        .ob3i4t
        .ob3l
        .obs4k
        .ob4sta
        .oe2
        .oh4r5ei
        .oh4rer
        .oper4
        .orge4
        .orgi3
        .ort4s5a
        .ort4s5e
        .ort4st
        .os4t3a4
        .ost5e4c
        .os4t5ei
        .os6t5en6de
        .os6teng
        .oste6r5e
        .os4tes
        .os4ti
        .osto4
        .ost5om
        .ost5ran
        .ost5ri
        .ot3a
        .ou4te
        .ozo2
        .ölk2
        .pa3b2
        .pa4nen
        .par4ka
        .par4k5l
        .par5th
        .pas6sers
        .paulet6
        .pe4c
        .pe3la
        .pel4za
        .pel4zw
        .pe3na
        .peri3
        .pes4t5e
        .pf2
        .pf4u
        .ph2
        .po4lei
        .po6lende.
        .po6lenden
        .po4p3l
        .postei6
        .prach4
        .pu5ert
        .ra5ch6e
        .ra4d5ei
        .ra4der
        .ra3el
        .ran4d5r
        .ran6g5e6b
        .ran4gl
        .rar4s
        .rau5f4r
        .rau4m3
        .rau6schl
        .rau6schw
        .rau4se
        .re4b3l
        .re5cha
        .re5chr
        .rei4bl
        .re5insz
